North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 3. Clients’ Rights and Advance Instruction.

Part 1. Client’s Rights.

§ 122C-51.
Declaration of policy on clients’ rights.

It is the policy of the State to assure basic human rights to each client of a facility. These rights include the right to dignity, privacy, humane care, and freedom from mental and physical abuse, neglect, and exploitation. Each facility shall assure to each client the right to live as normally as possible while receiving care and treatment.

It is further the policy of this State that each client who is admitted to and is receiving services from a facility has the right to treatment, including access to medical care and habilitation, regardless of age or degree of mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse. Each client has the right to an individualized written treatment or habilitation plan setting forth a program to maximize the development or restoration of his capabilities.

History.

1973, c. 475, s. 1; c. 1436, ss. 1, 8; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 7; 1997-442, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to penalties for violations of this Article, see

G.S. 122C-24.1

.

Legal Periodicals.

For note discussing the application of the constitutional right of privacy to a mental patient’s refusal of psychotropic medication, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 1481 (1979).

For comment on exclusionary zoning of community facilities, see 12 N.C. Cent. L.J. 167 (1980).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The provisions of former G.S. 122-55.1 through 122-55.14, relating to patients’ rights, applied to services provided for an area mental health authority (now area mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse authority) by a general hospital, etc., on a contractual basis. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. R.J. Bickel, Deputy Director for Administration, Division of Mental Health and Mental Retardation Services, 48 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 9 (1978).

See opinion of Attorney General to Dr. Lenore Behar, Chief, Children and Youth Services, Division of Mental Health Services, 44 N.C.A.G. 3 (1974), rendered under former statutory provisions.

§ 122C-52.
Right to confidentiality.

Except as provided in

G.S. 132-5

and

G.S. 122C-31(h)

, confidential information acquired in attending or treating a client is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

Except as authorized by

G.S. 122C-53

through

G.S. 122C-56

, no individual having access to confidential information may disclose this information, provided, however, a HIPAA covered entity or business associate receiving confidential information that has been disclosed pursuant to

G.S. 122C-53

through

G.S. 122C-56

may use and disclose such information as permitted or required under 45 Code of Federal Regulations Part 164, Subpart E.

Except as provided by

G.S. 122C-53

through

G.S. 122C-56

, each client has the right that no confidential information acquired be disclosed by the facility.

No provision of

G.S. 122C-205

and

G.S. 122C-53

through

G.S. 122C-56

permitting disclosure of confidential information may apply to the records of a client when federal statutes or regulations applicable to that client prohibit the disclosure of this information.

Except as required or permitted by law, disclosure of confidential information to someone not authorized to receive the information is a Class 3 misdemeanor and is punishable only by a fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

1955, c. 887, s. 12; 1963, c. 1166, s. 10; 1965, c. 800, s. 4; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 476, s. 133; c. 673, s. 5; c. 1408, s. 2; 1979, c. 147; 1983, c. 383, s. 10; c. 491; c. 638, s. 22; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 11; 1987, c. 749, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 920; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2009-299, s. 5; 2011-314, s. 2(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-299, s. 5, effective July 17, 2009, inserted “and

G.S. 122C-31(h)

” in subsection (a).

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 law on evidence, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1456 (1980).

For note, “Psychiatrists’ Liability to Third Parties for Harmful Acts Committed by Dangerous Patients,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1534 (1986).

§ 122C-53.
Exceptions; client.

A facility may disclose confidential information if the client or the legally responsible person consents in writing to the release of the information to a specified person. This release is valid for a specified length of time and is subject to revocation by the consenting individual.

A facility may disclose (i) the fact of admission or discharge of a client and (ii) the time and location of admission or discharge to the client’s next of kin whenever the responsible professional determines that the disclosure is in the best interest of the client.

Upon request a client shall have access to confidential information in the client’s record except information that would be injurious to the client’s physical or mental well-being as determined by the attending physician or, if there is none, by the facility director or the facility director’s designee. If the attending physician or, if there is none, the facility director or the facility director’s designee has refused to provide confidential information to a client, the client may request that the information be sent to a physician or psychologist of the client’s choice, and in this event the information shall be so provided.

Except as provided by

G.S. 90-21.4(b)

, upon request the legally responsible person of a client shall have access to confidential information in the client’s record; except information that would be injurious to the client’s physical or mental well-being as determined by the attending physician or, if there is none, by the facility director or the facility director’s designee. If the attending physician or, if there is none, the facility director or the facility director’s designee has refused to provide confidential information to the legally responsible person, the legally responsible person may request that the information be sent to a physician or psychologist of the legally responsible person’s choice, and in this event the information shall be so provided.

A client advocate’s access to confidential information and the client’s responsibility for safeguarding this information are as provided by subsection (g) of this section.

As used in subsection (g) of this section, the following terms have the meanings specified:

“Internal client advocate” means a client advocate who is employed by the facility or has a written contractual agreement with the Department or with the facility to provide monitoring and advocacy services to clients in the facility in which the client is receiving services.

“External client advocate” means a client advocate acting on behalf of a particular client with the written consent and authorization under either of the following circumstances:

In the case of a client who is an adult and who has not been adjudicated incompetent under Chapter 35A or former Chapters 33 or 35 of the General Statutes, of the client.

In the case of any other client, of the client and the legally responsible person.

An internal client advocate shall be granted, without the consent of the client or the legally responsible person, access to routine reports and other confidential information necessary to fulfill monitoring and advocacy functions. In this role, the internal client advocate may disclose confidential information received to the client involved, to the legally responsible person, to the director of the facility or the director’s designee, to other individuals within the facility who are involved in the treatment or habilitation of the client, or to the Secretary in accordance with the rules of the Commission. Any further disclosure shall require the written consent of the client and the legally responsible person. An external client advocate shall have access to confidential information only upon the written consent of the client and his legally responsible person. In this role, the external client advocate may use the information only as authorized by the client and his legally responsible person.

In accordance with

G.S. 122C-205

, the facility shall notify the appropriate individuals upon the escape from and subsequent return of clients to a 24-hour facility.

Upon the request of (i) a client who is an adult and who has not been adjudicated incompetent under Chapter 35A or former Chapters 33 or 35 of the General Statutes, or (ii) the legally responsible person for any other client, a facility shall disclose to an attorney confidential information relating to that client.

History.

1973, c. 475, s. 1; c. 1436, ss. 2-5; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 26(d); 1995, c. 507, s. 23.4; 2018-33, s. 3.

§ 122C-54.
Exceptions; abuse reports and court proceedings.

A facility shall disclose confidential information if a court of competent jurisdiction issues an order compelling disclosure.

(a1)

Upon a determination by the facility director or the facility director’s designee that disclosure is in the best interests of the client, a facility may disclose confidential information for purposes of filing a petition for involuntary commitment of a client pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter or for purposes of filing a petition for the adjudication of incompetency of the client and the appointment of a guardian or an interim guardian under Chapter 35A of the General Statutes.

If an individual is a defendant in a criminal case and a mental examination of the defendant has been ordered by the court as provided in

G.S. 15A-1002

, the facility shall send the results or the report of the mental examination to the clerk of court, to the district attorney or prosecuting officer, and to the attorney of record for the defendant as provided in

G.S. 15A-1002

(d). The report shall contain a treatment recommendation, if any, and an opinion as to whether there is a likelihood that the defendant will gain the capacity to proceed.

When an individual is held at a facility under involuntary commitment or voluntary admission proceedings that require district court hearings or rehearings pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter, certified copies of written results of examinations, gathered during the course of the current commitment or admission, shall be furnished by the facility to the client’s counsel, the attorney representing the State’s interest, and the court. Upon request, the facility shall disclose to respondent’s counsel, the attorney representing the State’s interest, and the court confidential information collected, maintained, or used in attending or treating the respondent during the proceeding for voluntary admission or involuntary commitment. Other medical records shall be furnished only upon court order. The confidentiality of client information shall be preserved in all matters except those pertaining to the necessity for admission or continued stay in the facility or commitment under review.

Any individual seeking confidential information contained in the court files or the court records of a proceeding made pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter may file a written motion in the cause setting out why the information is needed. A district court judge may issue an order to disclose the confidential information sought if he finds the order is appropriate under the circumstances and if he finds that it is in the best interest of the individual admitted or committed or of the public to have the information disclosed.

(d1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-195, s. 11(a), effective January 1, 2016.

(d2)

The record of involuntary commitment for inpatient or outpatient mental health treatment or for substance abuse treatment required to be reported to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) by G.S. 14-409.43 shall be accessible only by the sheriff or the sheriff’s designee for the purposes of conducting background checks under

G.S. 14-404

and shall remain otherwise confidential as provided by this Article.

Upon the request of the legally responsible person or the minor admitted or committed, and after that minor has both been released and reached adulthood, the court records of that minor made in proceedings pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter may be expunged from the files of the court. The minor and the minor’s legally responsible person shall be informed in writing by the court of the right provided by this subsection at the time that the application for admission is filed with the court.

A State facility and the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill may disclose confidential information to staff attorneys of the Attorney General’s office whenever the information is necessary to the performance of the statutory responsibilities of the Attorney General’s office or to its performance when acting as attorney for a State facility or the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill.

A facility may disclose confidential information to an attorney who represents either the facility or an employee of the facility, if such information is relevant to litigation, to the operations of the facility, or to the provision of services by the facility. An employee may discuss confidential information with the employee’s attorney or with an attorney representing the facility in which the employee is employed.

A facility shall disclose confidential information for purposes of complying with Article 3 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes and Article 6 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes, or as required by other State or federal law.

G.S. 132-1.4

shall apply to the records of criminal investigations conducted by any law enforcement unit of a State facility, and information described in

G.S. 132-1.4(c)

that is collected by the State facility law enforcement unit shall be public records within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, the Secretary may inform any person of any incident or event involving the welfare of a client or former client when the Secretary determines that the release of the information is essential to maintaining the integrity of the Department. However, the release shall not include information that identifies the client directly, or information for which disclosure is prohibited by State or federal law or requirements, or information for which, in the Secretary’s judgment, by reference to publicly known or available information, there is a reasonable basis to believe the client will be identified.

History.

1955, c. 887, s. 12; 1963, c. 1166, s. 10; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 476, s. 133; c. 673, s. 5; c. 1408, s. 2; 1977, c. 696, s. 1; 1979, c. 147; c. 915, s. 20; 1983, c. 383, s. 10; c. 491; c. 638, s. 22; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 638, ss. 1, 3.1; 1989, c. 141, s. 9; 1993, c. 516, s. 12; 1998-202, s. 13(dd); 2003-313, s. 2; 2008-210, s. 1; 2009-299, s. 6; 2013-18, s. 7; 2013-369, ss. 7, 8; 2015-195, s. 11(a), (e); 2018-33, s. 4.

§ 122C-54.1.

Recodified as

G.S. 14-409.42

by Session Laws 2015-195, s. 11(b), effective August 5, 2015.

§ 122C-55.
Exceptions; care and treatment. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Any facility may share confidential information regarding any client of that facility with any other facility when necessary to coordinate appropriate and effective care, treatment, or habilitation of the client. For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

“Client” includes an enrollee as defined in

G.S. 108D-1

.

(1a)

Coordinate. — The provision, coordination, or management of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services and other health or related services by one or more facilities and includes the referral of a client from one facility to another.

Facility or area facility. — Include[s] an area authority or a prepaid health plan.

Secretary. — Includes any primary care case management programs that contract with the Department to provide a primary care case management program for recipients of publicly funded health and related services.

(a1)

Any facility may share confidential information regarding any client of that facility with the Secretary, and the Secretary may share confidential information regarding any client with a facility when necessary to conduct quality assessment and improvement activities or to coordinate appropriate and effective care, treatment, or habilitation of the client. For purposes of this subsection, subsection (a6), and subsection (a7) of this section, the purposes or activities for which confidential information may be disclosed include, but are not limited to, case management and care coordination, disease management, outcomes evaluation, the development of clinical guidelines and protocols, the development of care management plans and systems, population-based activities relating to improving or reducing health care costs, and the provision, coordination, or management of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services and other health or related services.

(a2)

Any facility or the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill may share confidential information regarding any client of that facility with any other area facility or State facility or the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill when necessary to conduct payment activities relating to an individual served by the facility. Payment activities are activities undertaken by a facility to obtain payment or receive reimbursement for the provision of services and may include, but are not limited to, determinations of eligibility or coverage, coordination of benefits, determinations of cost-sharing amounts, claims management, claims processing, claims adjudication, claims appeals, billing and collection activities, medical necessity reviews, utilization management and review, precertification and preauthorization of services, concurrent and retrospective review of services, and appeals related to utilization management and review.

(a3)

Whenever there is reason to believe that a client is eligible for benefits through a Department program, any facility or the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill may share confidential information regarding any client of that facility with the Secretary, and the Secretary may share confidential information regarding any client with an area facility or State facility or the psychiatric services of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill. Disclosure is limited to that information necessary to establish initial eligibility for benefits, determine continued eligibility over time, and obtain reimbursement for the costs of services provided to the client.

(a4)

An area authority or prepaid health plan may share confidential information regarding any client with any area facility, and any area facility may share confidential information regarding any client of that facility with the area authority or prepaid health plan, when the area authority or prepaid health plan determines the disclosure is necessary to develop, manage, monitor, or evaluate the area authority’s or prepaid health plan’s network of qualified providers as provided in G.S. 122C-115.2(b)(1)b., G.S. 122C-141(a), Article 3 of Chapter 108D of the General Statutes, the State Plan, rules of the Secretary, and contracts between the facility and the Department. For the purposes of this subsection, the purposes or activities for which confidential information may be disclosed include, but are not limited to, quality assessment and improvement activities, provider accreditation and staff credentialing, developing contracts and negotiating rates, investigating and responding to client grievances and complaints, evaluating practitioner and provider performance, auditing functions, on-site monitoring, conducting consumer satisfaction studies, and collecting and analyzing performance data.

(a5)

Any area facility may share confidential information with any other area facility regarding an applicant when necessary to determine whether the applicant is eligible for area facility services. For the purpose of this subsection, the term “applicant” means an individual who contacts an area facility for services.

(a6)

When necessary to conduct quality assessment and improvement activities or to coordinate appropriate and effective care, treatment, or habilitation of the client, the Department’s Community Care of North Carolina Program, or other primary care case management program, may disclose confidential information acquired pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section to a health care provider or other entity that has entered into a written agreement with the Community Care of North Carolina Program, or other primary care case management program, to participate in the care management support network and systems developed and maintained by the primary care case manager for the purpose of coordinating and improving the quality of care for recipients of publicly funded health and related services. Health care providers and other entities receiving confidential information that has been disclosed pursuant to this subsection may use and disclose the information as permitted or required under 45 Code of Federal Regulations Part 164, Subpart E.

(a7)

A facility may share confidential information with one or more HIPAA covered entities or business associates for the same purposes set forth in subsection (a1) of this section. Before making disclosures under this subsection, the facility shall inform the client or the client’s legally responsible person that the facility may make the disclosures unless the client or the client’s legally responsible person objects in writing or signs a non-disclosure form that shall be supplied by the facility. If the client or the client’s legally responsible person objects in writing or signs a non-disclosure form, the disclosures otherwise permitted by this subsection are prohibited. A covered entity or business associate receiving confidential information that has been disclosed by a facility pursuant to this subsection may use and disclose the information as permitted or required under 45 Code of Federal Regulations Part 164, Subpart E. This confidential information, however, shall not be used or disclosed for discriminatory purposes including, without limitation, employment discrimination, medical insurance coverage or rate discrimination, or discrimination by law enforcement officers.

A facility, physician, or other individual responsible for evaluation, management, supervision, or treatment of respondents examined or committed for outpatient treatment under the provisions of Article 5 of this Chapter may request, receive, and disclose confidential information to the extent necessary to fulfill the facility’s, physician’s, or individual’s responsibilities.

A facility may furnish confidential information in its possession to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety when requested by that department regarding any client of that facility when the inmate has been determined by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety to be in need of treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse. The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may furnish to a facility confidential information in its possession about treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse that the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety has provided to any present or former inmate if the inmate is presently seeking treatment from the requesting facility or if the inmate has been involuntarily committed to the requesting facility for inpatient or outpatient treatment. Under the circumstances described in this subsection, the consent of the client or inmate is not required in order for this information to be furnished, and the information shall be furnished despite objection by the client or inmate. Confidential information disclosed pursuant to this subsection is restricted from further disclosure.

(c1)

(See editor’s note for effective date information)

A facility may furnish confidential information in its possession to the sheriff of any county when requested by the sheriff regarding any client of that facility who is confined in the county’s jail or jail annex when the inmate has been determined by the county jail medical unit to be in need of treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse. The sheriff may furnish to a facility confidential information in its possession about treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse that the county jail medical unit has provided to any present or former inmate if the inmate is presently seeking treatment from the requesting facility or if the inmate has been involuntarily committed to the requesting facility for inpatient or outpatient treatment. Under the circumstances described in this subsection, the consent of the client or inmate is not required in order for this information to be furnished, and the information shall be furnished despite objection by the client or inmate. Confidential information disclosed pursuant to this subsection is restricted from further disclosure.

A responsible professional may disclose confidential information when in the responsible professional’s opinion there is an imminent danger to the health or safety of the client or another individual or there is a likelihood of the commission of a felony or violent misdemeanor.

A responsible professional may exchange confidential information with a physician or other health care provider that is providing emergency medical services to a client. Disclosure of the information is limited to that necessary to meet the emergency as determined by the responsible professional.

(e1)

A State facility may furnish client identifying information to the Department for the purpose of maintaining an index of clients served in State facilities that may be used by State facilities only if that information is necessary for the appropriate and effective evaluation, care, and treatment of the client.

(e2)

A responsible professional may disclose an advance instruction for mental health treatment or confidential information from an advance instruction to a physician, psychologist, or other qualified professional when the responsible professional determines that disclosure is necessary to give effect to or provide treatment in accordance with the advance instruction.

A facility may disclose confidential information to a provider of support services whenever the facility has entered into a written agreement with a person to provide support services and the agreement includes a provision in which the provider of support services acknowledges that in receiving, storing, processing, or otherwise dealing with any confidential information, the provider of support services will safeguard and not further disclose the information.

Whenever there is reason to believe that the client is eligible for financial benefits through a governmental agency, a facility may disclose confidential information to State, local, or federal government agencies. Except as provided in subsections (a3) and (g1) of this section, disclosure is limited to that confidential information necessary to establish financial benefits for a client. Except as provided in subsection (g1) of this section, after establishment of these benefits, the consent of the client or the client’s legally responsible person is required for further release of confidential information under this subsection.

(g1)

A State facility operated under the authority of

G.S. 122C-181

may disclose confidential information for the purpose of collecting payment due the facility for the cost of care, treatment, or habilitation.

(g2)

Whenever there is reason to believe that the client is eligible for educational services through a governmental agency, a facility shall disclose client identifying information to the Department of Public Instruction. Disclosure is limited to that information necessary to establish, coordinate, or maintain educational services. The Department of Public Instruction may further disclose client identifying information to a local school administrative unit as necessary.

Within a facility, employees, students, consultants, or volunteers involved in the care, treatment, or habilitation of a client may exchange confidential information as needed for the purpose of carrying out their responsibility in serving the client.

Upon specific request, a responsible professional may release confidential information to a physician or psychologist who referred the client to the facility.

Upon request of the next of kin or other family member who has a legitimate role in the therapeutic services offered, or other person designated by the client or the client’s legally responsible person, the responsible professional shall provide the next of kin or other family member or the designee with notification of the client’s diagnosis, the prognosis, the medications prescribed, the dosage of the medications prescribed, the side effects of the medications prescribed, if any, and the progress of the client, if the client or the client’s legally responsible person has consented in writing, or the client has consented orally in the presence of a witness selected by the client, prior to the release of this information. Both the client’s or the legally responsible person’s consent and the release of this information shall be documented in the client’s medical record. This consent shall be valid for a specified length of time only and is subject to revocation by the consenting individual.

Notwithstanding G.S. 122C-53(b) or

G.S. 122C-206

, upon request of the next of kin or other family member who has a legitimate role in the therapeutic services offered, or other person designated by the client or the client’s legally responsible person, the responsible professional shall provide the next of kin, the family member, or the designee, notification of the client’s admission to the facility, transfer to another facility, decision to leave the facility against medical advice, discharge from the facility, and referrals and appointment information for treatment after discharge, after notification to the client that this information has been requested.

In response to a written request of the next of kin or other family member who has a legitimate role in the therapeutic services offered, or other person designated by the client, for additional information not provided for in subsections (j) and (k) of this section, and when the written request identifies the intended use for this information, the responsible professional shall, in a timely manner, do one or more of the following:

Provide the information requested based upon the responsible professional’s determination that providing this information will be to the client’s therapeutic benefit, if the client or the client’s legally responsible person has consented in writing to the release of the information requested.

Refuse to provide the information requested based upon the responsible professional’s determination that providing this information will be detrimental to the therapeutic relationship between client and professional.

Refuse to provide the information requested based upon the responsible professional’s determination that the next of kin or family member or designee does not have a legitimate need for the information requested.

The Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services shall adopt rules specifically to define the legitimate role referred to in subsections (j), (k), and (l) of this section.

History.

1955, c. 887, s. 12; 1963, c. 1166, s. 10; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 476, s. 133; c. 673, s. 5; c. 1408, s. 2; 1979, c. 147; 1983, c. 383, s. 10; c. 491; c. 638, s. 22; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 15; 1987, c. 638, ss. 2, 3; 1989, c. 141, s. 10; c. 438; c. 625, s. 8; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 27; 1991, c. 359, s. 1; c. 544, s. 1; 1998-198, s. 4; 2003-313, s. 3; 2009-65, s. 1(a), (b); 2009-487, s. 5; 2009-570, s. 43; 2011-102, ss. 3, 4; 2011-145, ss. 10.14, 19.1(h); 2011-314, s. 2(b); 2011-391, s. 23; 2014-100, s. 8.39(d); 2017-186, s. 2(kkkkk); 2018-33, s. 5; 2019-81, s. 9A; 2019-177, s. 6.1(a), (b); 2019-240, s. 26(c).